Illinois, session 104th, SB1853.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended by 5changing Sections 15, 15d, 16, 17, and 17.5 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 670/15)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5415)7    Sec. 15. Charges permitted. 8    (a) Every licensee may lend a principal amount not 9exceeding $40,000 and may charge, contract for and receive 10thereon an annual percentage rate of no more than 36% plus the 11Federal Funds Rate, subject to the provisions of this Act. For 12purposes of this Section, the annual percentage rate shall be 13calculated as such rate is calculated using the system for 14calculating the annual percentage rate under the federal Truth 15in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., and its implementing 16regulations under Regulation Z, 12 CFR 1026.1 et seq. As used 17in this subsection, "Federal Funds Rate" means the rate 18published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve 19System in its Statistical Release H.15 Selected Interest Rates 20in effect on the first day of the month immediately preceding 21the month during which the loan is consummated. If the Federal 22Reserve System stops publication of the Federal Funds Rate, 23the Director of the Division of Financial Institutions shall   SB1853- 2 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1designate a substantially equivalent index a military annual 2percentage rate under Section 232.4 of Title 32 of the Code of 3Federal Regulations as in effect on the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.5    (b) For purpose of this Section, the following terms shall 6have the meanings ascribed herein.7    "Applicable interest" for a precomputed loan contract 8means the amount of interest attributable to each monthly 9installment period. It is computed as if each installment 10period were one month and any interest charged for extending 11the first installment period beyond one month is ignored. The 12applicable interest for any monthly installment period is that 13portion of the precomputed interest that bears the same ratio 14to the total precomputed interest as the balances scheduled to 15be outstanding during that month bear to the sum of all 16scheduled monthly outstanding balances in the original 17contract. 18    "Interest-bearing loan" means a loan in which the debt is 19expressed as a principal amount plus interest charged on 20actual unpaid principal balances for the time actually 21outstanding.22    "Precomputed loan" means a loan in which the debt is 23expressed as the sum of the original principal amount plus 24interest computed actuarially in advance, assuming all 25payments will be made when scheduled.26    "Substantially equal installment" includes a last   SB1853- 3 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1regularly scheduled payment that may be less than, but not 2more than 5% larger than, the previous scheduled payment 3according to a disclosed payment schedule agreed to by the 4parties.5    (c) Loans may be interest-bearing or precomputed.6    (d) To compute time for either interest-bearing or 7precomputed loans for the calculation of interest and other 8purposes, a month shall be a calendar month and a day shall be 9considered 1/30th of a month when calculation is made for a 10fraction of a month. A month shall be 1/12th of a year. A 11calendar month is that period from a given date in one month to 12the same numbered date in the following month, and if there is 13no same numbered date, to the last day of the following month. 14When a period of time includes a month and a fraction of a 15month, the fraction of the month is considered to follow the 16whole month. In the alternative, for interest-bearing loans, 17the licensee may charge interest at the rate of 1/365th of the 18agreed annual rate for each day actually elapsed.19    (d-5) No licensee or other person may condition an 20extension of credit to a consumer on the consumer's repayment 21by preauthorized electronic fund transfers. Payment options, 22including, but not limited to, electronic fund transfers and 23Automatic Clearing House (ACH) transactions may be offered to 24consumers as a choice and method of payment chosen by the 25consumer. 26    (e) With respect to interest-bearing loans:  SB1853- 4 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1        (1) Interest shall be computed on unpaid principal 2    balances outstanding from time to time, for the time 3    outstanding, until fully paid. Each payment shall be 4    applied first to the accumulated interest and the 5    remainder of the payment applied to the unpaid principal 6    balance; provided however, that if the amount of the 7    payment is insufficient to pay the accumulated interest, 8    the unpaid interest continues to accumulate to be paid 9    from the proceeds of subsequent payments and is not added 10    to the principal balance.11        (2) Interest shall not be payable in advance or 12    compounded. However, if part or all of the consideration 13    for a new loan contract is the unpaid principal balance of 14    a prior loan, then the principal amount payable under the 15    new loan contract may include any unpaid interest which 16    has accrued. The unpaid principal balance of a precomputed 17    loan is the balance due after refund or credit of unearned 18    interest as provided in paragraph (f), clause (3). The 19    resulting loan contract shall be deemed a new and separate 20    loan transaction for all purposes.21        (3) Loans must be fully amortizing and be repayable in 22    substantially equal and consecutive weekly, biweekly, 23    semimonthly, or monthly installments. Notwithstanding this 24    requirement, rates may vary according to an index that is 25    independently verifiable and beyond the control of the 26    licensee.  SB1853- 5 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1        (4) The lender or creditor may, if the contract 2    provides, collect a delinquency or collection charge on 3    each installment in default for a period of not less than 4    10 days in an amount not exceeding 5% of the installment on 5    installments in excess of $200, or $10 on installments of 6    $200 or less, but only one delinquency and collection 7    charge may be collected on any installment regardless of 8    the period during which it remains in default.9    (f) With respect to precomputed loans:10        (1) Loans shall be repayable in substantially equal 11    and consecutive weekly, biweekly, semimonthly, or monthly 12    installments of principal and interest combined, except 13    that the first installment period may be longer than one 14    month by not more than 15 days, and the first installment 15    payment amount may be larger than the remaining payments 16    by the amount of interest charged for the extra days; and 17    provided further that monthly installment payment dates 18    may be omitted to accommodate borrowers with seasonal 19    income.20        (2) Payments may be applied to the combined total of 21    principal and precomputed interest until the loan is fully 22    paid. Payments shall be applied in the order in which they 23    become due, except that any insurance proceeds received as 24    a result of any claim made on any insurance, unless 25    sufficient to prepay the contract in full, may be applied 26    to the unpaid installments of the total of payments in   SB1853- 6 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1    inverse order.2        (3) When any loan contract is paid in full by cash, 3    renewal or refinancing, or a new loan, one month or more 4    before the final installment due date, a licensee shall 5    refund or credit the obligor with the total of the 6    applicable interest for all fully unexpired installment 7    periods, as originally scheduled or as deferred, which 8    follow the day of prepayment; provided, if the prepayment 9    occurs prior to the first installment due date, the 10    licensee may retain 1/30 of the applicable interest for a 11    first installment period of one month for each day from 12    the date of the loan to the date of prepayment, and shall 13    refund or credit the obligor with the balance of the total 14    interest contracted for. If the maturity of the loan is 15    accelerated for any reason and judgment is entered, the 16    licensee shall credit the borrower with the same refund as 17    if prepayment in full had been made on the date the 18    judgment is entered.19        (4) The lender or creditor may, if the contract 20    provides, collect a delinquency or collection charge on 21    each installment in default for a period of not less than 22    10 days in an amount not exceeding 5% of the installment on 23    installments in excess of $200, or $10 on installments of 24    $200 or less, but only one delinquency or collection 25    charge may be collected on any installment regardless of 26    the period during which it remains in default.  SB1853- 7 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1        (5) If the parties agree in writing, either in the 2    loan contract or in a subsequent agreement, to a deferment 3    of wholly unpaid installments, a licensee may grant a 4    deferment and may collect a deferment charge as provided 5    in this Section. A deferment postpones the scheduled due 6    date of the earliest unpaid installment and all subsequent 7    installments as originally scheduled, or as previously 8    deferred, for a period equal to the deferment period. The 9    deferment period is that period during which no 10    installment is scheduled to be paid by reason of the 11    deferment. The deferment charge for a one-month period may 12    not exceed the applicable interest for the installment 13    period immediately following the due date of the last 14    undeferred payment. A proportionate charge may be made for 15    deferment for periods of more or less than one month. A 16    deferment charge is earned pro rata during the deferment 17    period and is fully earned on the last day of the deferment 18    period. Should a loan be prepaid in full during a 19    deferment period, the licensee shall credit to the obligor 20    a refund of the unearned deferment charge in addition to 21    any other refund or credit made for prepayment of the loan 22    in full.23        (6) If 2 or more installments are delinquent one full 24    month or more on any due date, and if the contract so 25    provides, the licensee may reduce the unpaid balance by 26    the refund credit which would be required for prepayment   SB1853- 8 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1    in full on the due date of the most recent maturing 2    installment in default. Thereafter, and in lieu of any 3    other default or deferment charges, the agreed rate of 4    interest may be charged on the unpaid balance until fully 5    paid.6        (7) Fifteen days after the final installment as 7    originally scheduled or deferred, the licensee, for any 8    loan contract which has not previously been converted to 9    interest-bearing under paragraph (f), clause (6), may 10    compute and charge interest on any balance remaining 11    unpaid, including unpaid default or deferment charges, at 12    the agreed rate of interest until fully paid. At the time 13    of payment of said final installment, the licensee shall 14    give notice to the obligor stating any amounts unpaid.15    (g) A licensee shall not charge, impose, or receive any 16penalty for the prepayment of a loan. 17(Source: P.A. 103-1014, eff. 8-9-24.) 18    (205 ILCS 670/15d)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5419)19    Sec. 15d. Extra charges prohibited; exceptions. 20    (a) No amount in addition to the charges authorized by 21this Act shall be directly or indirectly charged, contracted 22for, or received, except (1) lawful fees paid to any public 23officer or agency to record, file or release security; (2) (i) 24costs and disbursements actually incurred in connection with a 25real estate loan, for any title insurance, title examination,   SB1853- 9 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1abstract of title, survey, or appraisal, or paid to a trustee 2in connection with a trust deed, and (ii) in connection with a 3real estate loan those charges authorized by Section 4.1a of 4the Interest Act, whether called "points" or otherwise, which 5charges are imposed as a condition for making the loan and are 6not refundable in the event of prepayment of the loan; (3) 7costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney's fees, 8incurred in legal proceedings to collect a loan or to realize 9on a security after default; and (4) an amount not exceeding 10$25, plus any actual expenses incurred in connection with a 11check or draft that is not honored because of insufficient or 12uncollected funds or because no such account exists; and (5) 13an administrative fee of up to $75 on loans up to $5,000 as 14described in subsection (b). This Section does not prohibit 15the receipt of a commission, dividend, charge, or other 16benefit by the licensee or by an employee, affiliate, or 17associate of the licensee from the insurance permitted by 18Sections 15a and 15b of this Act or from insurance in lieu of 19perfecting a security interest provided that the premiums for 20such insurance do not exceed the fees that otherwise could be 21contracted for by the licensee under this Section. Obtaining 22any of the items referred to in clause (i) of item (2) of this 23Section through the licensee or from any person specified by 24the licensee shall not be a condition precedent to the 25granting of the loan.26    (b) A licensee may contract for and receive an   SB1853- 10 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1administrative fee that shall be fully earned immediately upon 2making the loan with a principal amount of not more than 3$5,000, excluding the administrative fee, at a rate not to 4exceed $75. No administrative fee may be contracted for or 5received in connection with the refinancing of a loan unless 6at least one year has elapsed since the receipt of a previous 7administrative fee paid by the borrower. Only one 8administrative fee may be contracted for or received after the 9consummation of the loan. An administrative fee shall not be 10considered as a penalty for the prepayment of a loan.11(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 12    (205 ILCS 670/16)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5420)13    Sec. 16. Disclosure of Terms of Contract. In any loan 14transaction under this Act, the licensee must disclose the 15following items to the obligor of the loan before the 16transaction is consummated:17    (a) The amount and date of the loan contract;18    (b) The amount of the loan using the term "amount 19financed";20    (c) Any deduction from the amount financed or payment made 21by the obligor for insurance and the type of insurance for 22which each deduction or payment was made;23    (d) Any additional deduction from the loan or payment made 24by the obligor in connection with obtaining the loan;25    (e) The date on which the finance charge begins to accrue   SB1853- 11 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1if different from the date of the transaction;2    (f) The total amount of the loan charge with a description 3of each amount included using the term "finance charge";4    (g) The finance charge expressed as an annual percentage 5rate using the term "annual percentage rate".6    "Annual percentage rate" means the nominal annual 7percentage rate of finance charge determined in accordance 8with the actuarial method of computation with an accuracy at 9least to the nearest 1/4 of 1%; or at the option of the 10licensee by application of the United States rule so that it 11may be disclosed with an accuracy at least to the nearest 1/4 12of 1%;13    (h) The number, amount and due dates or periods of 14payments scheduled to repay the loan and the sum of such 15payments using the term "total of payments";16    (i) The amount, or method of computing the amount of any 17default, delinquency or similar charges payable in the event 18of late payments;19    (j) The right of the obligor to prepay the loan in full on 20any installment date and the fact that such prepayment in full 21will reduce the insurance charge for the loan;22    (k) A description or identification of the type of any 23security interest held or to be retained or acquired by the 24licensee in connection with the loan and a clear 25identification of the property to which the security interest 26relates. If after-acquired property will be subject to the   SB1853- 12 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1security interest, or if other or future indebtedness is or 2may be secured by any such property, this fact shall be clearly 3set forth in conjunction with the description or 4identification of the type of security interest held, retained 5or acquired;6    (l) A description expressly stating there are no penalties 7for prepayment of the loan of any penalty charge that may be 8imposed by the licensee for prepayment of the principal of the 9obligation with an explanation of the method of computation of 10such penalty and the conditions under which it may be imposed;11    (m) Identification and description of the method of 12computing any unearned portion of the finance charge in the 13event of prepayment of the loan, and if the licensee uses the 14"Rule of 78THS" method, including a statement explaining such 15method substantially as follows: 16        Unearned finance charges under the Rule of 78ths are 17    computed by calculating for all fully unexpired monthly 18    installment periods, as originally scheduled or deferred, 19    which follow the day of prepayment, the portion of the 20    precomputed interest that bears the same ratio to the 21    total precomputed interest as the balances scheduled to be 22    outstanding during that monthly installment period bear to 23    the sum of all scheduled monthly outstanding balances 24    originally contracted for.25    The description shall also include an example of its 26application solely for purposes of illustration in   SB1853- 13 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1substantially the following form:2PREPAYMENT - "RULE OF 78THS" 3                       Sum of balances due every month after 4Unearned = Original x    prepayment 5Charge     Charge*     Sum of balances due every month of 6                         contract7*for Finance Charge (excluding any charges added for a first 8payment period of more than one month) or credit insurance 9charges.10Example: 12 monthly payments of $10 (balance is $120 1st 11month, $110 2nd month, and so on), $20 Finance Charge. If 5 12payments are prepaid in full, unearned Finance Charge is:13$20 x _____________50+40+30+20+10___________ = $3.8514      120+110+100+90+80+70+60+50+40+30+20+1015    The terms "finance charge" and "annual percentage rate" 16shall be printed more conspicuously than other terminology 17required by this Section.18    If a loan made under this Act is prepaid, the computation 19of the unearned portion of the finance charge as described in 20this Section shall not be considered as a penalty for the 21prepayment of the loan.22    At the time disclosures are made, the licensee shall 23deliver to the obligor a duplicate of the instrument or 24statement by which the required disclosures are made and on 25which the licensee and obligor are identified and their 26addresses stated. All of the disclosures shall be made   SB1853- 14 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1clearly, conspicuously and in meaningful sequence and made 2together on either: 3        (i) the note or other instrument evidencing the 4    obligation. Where a creditor elects to combine disclosures 5    with the contract, security agreement, and evidence of a 6    transaction in a single document, the disclosures required 7    under Section 16 shall be made on the face of the document, 8    on the reverse side, or on both sides, provided that the 9    amount of the finance charge and the annual percentage 10    rate shall appear on the face of the document, and, if the 11    reverse side is used, the printing on both sides of the 12    document shall be equally clear and conspicuous, both 13    sides shall contain the statement, "NOTICE: See other side 14    for important information", and the place for the 15    obligor's signature shall be provided following the full 16    content of the document; or 17        (ii) One side of a separate statement which identifies 18    the transaction.19    The amount of the finance charge shall be determined as 20the sum of all charges, payable directly or indirectly by the 21obligor and imposed directly or indirectly by the licensee as 22an incident to or as a condition to the extension of credit, 23whether paid or payable by the obligor, any other person on 24behalf of the obligor, to the licensee or to a third party, 25including any of the following types of charges: 26        (1) Interest, time price differential, and any amount   SB1853- 15 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1    payable under a discount or other system of additional 2    charges. 3        (2) Service, transaction, activity, or carrying 4    charge. 5        (3) Loan fee, points, finder's fee, or similar charge. 6        (4) Fee for an appraisal, investigation, or credit 7    report. 8        (5) Charges or premiums for credit life, accident, 9    health, or loss of income insurance, written in connection 10    with any credit transaction unless: 11            (i) the insurance coverage is not required by the 12        licensee and this fact is clearly and conspicuously 13        disclosed in writing to the obligor; and 14            (ii) any obligor desiring such insurance coverage 15        gives specific dated and separately signed affirmative 16        written indication of such desire after receiving 17        written disclosure to him of the cost of such 18        insurance. 19        (6) Charges or premiums for insurance, written in 20    connection with any credit transaction, against loss of or 21    damage to property or against liability arising out of the 22    ownership or use of property unless a clear, conspicuous, 23    and specific statement in writing is furnished by the 24    licensee to the obligor setting forth the cost of the 25    insurance if obtained from or through the licensee and 26    stating that the obligor may choose the person through   SB1853- 16 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1    which the insurance is to be obtained. 2        (7) Premium or other charge for any other guarantee or 3    insurance protecting the licensee against the obligor's 4    default or other credit loss. 5        (8) Any charge imposed by a licensee upon another 6    licensee for purchasing or accepting an obligation of an 7    obligor if the obligor is required to pay any part of that 8    charge in cash, as an addition to the obligation, or as a 9    deduction from the proceeds of the obligation.10    A late payment, delinquency, default, reinstatement or 11other charge is not a finance charge if imposed for actual 12unanticipated late payment, delinquency, default or other 13occurrence.14    A licensee who complies with the federal Truth in Lending 15Act, amendments thereto, and any regulations issued or which 16may be issued thereunder, shall be deemed to be in compliance 17with the provisions of this Section, except with respect to 18the disclosure in paragraph (m), which may be set forth in any 19manner.20(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 21    (205 ILCS 670/17)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5423)22    Sec. 17. Maximum term and amount. 23    (a) The loan contract for a loan of more than $10,000 shall 24provide for repayment of the principal and charges within 181 25months from the date of the loan contract or the last advance,   SB1853- 17 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1if any, required by the loan contract.2    (b) The loan contract for a loan of $10,000 or less shall 3provide for repayment of the principal and charges at least 12 4months and no more than 60 months and 15 days from the date of 5the loan contract or the last advance, if any, required by the 6loan contract.7    (c) No licensee shall permit an obligor to owe such 8licensee or an affiliate (including a corporation owned or 9managed by the licensee) or agent of such licensee an 10aggregate principal amount of more than $40,000 at any time 11for loans transacted pursuant to this Act.12(Source: P.A. 93-264, eff. 1-1-04.) 13    (205 ILCS 670/17.5)14    Sec. 17.5. Reporting to consumer reporting agencies and 15financial education Consumer reporting service.16    (a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, every licensee shall 17report each borrower's payment performance to at least one 18consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on 19consumers on a nationwide basis. For purposes of this Section, 20a "consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files 21on consumers on a nationwide basis" has the meaning ascribed 22to that term in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p). For the purpose of this 23Section, "certified database" means the consumer reporting 24service database established pursuant to the Payday Loan 25Reform Act. "Title-secured loan" means a loan in which, at   SB1853- 18 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1commencement, a consumer provides to the licensee, as security 2for the loan, physical possession of the consumer's title to a 3motor vehicle.4    (b) No later than January 1, 2026, every licensee shall 5obtain approval to report to at least one consumer reporting 6agency and, once approved, shall report borrower payment 7performance to that consumer reporting agency in connection 8with all loans made on and after January 1, 2026. Licensees 9shall enter information regarding each loan into the certified 10database and shall follow the Department's related rules.11    (c) Before disbursing loan proceeds to a borrower, a 12licensee shall offer the borrower a credit education program 13or seminar provided by the licensee or a third party provider 14that has been reviewed and approved by the Director for use in 15complying with this Section. A credit education program or 16seminar may be provided in writing, electronically, or orally, 17but, if provided orally, shall be accompanied by written or 18electronic materials that a prospective borrower can retain or 19access following the conclusion of the program or seminar For 20every title-secured loan made, the licensee shall input 21information as provided in 38 Ill. Adm. Code 110.420.22    (d) The Director shall approve credit education programs 23or seminars that, at a minimum, cover all of the following 24topics concerning credit scores and credit reports provided by 25consumer reporting agencies:26        (1) the value of establishing a credit score;  SB1853- 19 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1        (2) ways to establish a credit score;2        (3) ways to improve a credit score;3        (4) factors that impact a credit score;4        (5) ways to check a credit score;5        (6) ways to obtain a free copy of a credit report; and6        (7) ways to dispute an error in a credit report The 7    certified database provider shall indemnify the licensee 8    against all claims and actions arising from illegal or 9    willful or wanton acts on the part of the certified 10    database provider. The certified database provider may 11    charge a fee not to exceed $1 for each loan entered into 12    the certified database. The database provider shall not 13    charge any additional fees or charges to the licensee.14    (e) A credit education program or seminar offered under 15this Section shall be offered at no cost to the borrower.16    (f) A licensee shall not require a borrower to participate 17in a credit education program or seminar as a condition of a 18loan.19(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 20    Section 10. The Predatory Loan Prevention Act is amended 21by changing Sections 15-1-5 and 15-5-5 as follows: 22    (815 ILCS 123/15-1-5)23    Sec. 15-1-5. Purpose and construction. Illinois families 24pay over $500,000,000 per year in consumer installment,   SB1853- 20 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1payday, and title loan fees. As reported by the Department in 22020, nearly half of Illinois payday loan borrowers earn less 3than $30,000 per year, and the average annual percentage rate 4of a payday loan is 297%. The purpose of this Act is to protect 5consumers from predatory loans consistent with federal law and 6the Military Lending Act which protects active duty members of 7the military. This Act shall be construed as a consumer 8protection law for all purposes. This Act shall be liberally 9construed to effectuate its purpose.10(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 11    (815 ILCS 123/15-5-5)12    Sec. 15-5-5. Rate cap. Notwithstanding any other provision 13of law, for loans made or renewed on and after the effective 14date of this Act, a lender shall not contract for or receive 15charges exceeding an annual percentage rate of a 36% plus the 16Federal Funds Rate annual percentage rate on the unpaid 17balance of the amount financed for a loan. For purposes of this 18Section, the annual percentage rate shall be calculated as 19such rate is calculated using the system for calculating the 20annual percentage rate under the federal Truth in Lending Act, 2115 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., and its implementing regulations under 22Regulation Z, 12 CFR 1026 et seq a military annual percentage 23rate under Section 232.4 of Title 32 of the Code of Federal 24Regulations as in effect on the effective date of this Act. 25Nothing in this Act shall be construed to permit a person or   SB1853- 21 -LRB104 07583 SPS 17627 b1entity to contract for or receive a charge exceeding that 2permitted by the Interest Act or other law. As used in this 3Section, "Federal Funds Rate" means the rate published by the 4Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System in its 5Statistical Release H.15 Selected Interest Rates in effect on 6the first day of the month immediately preceding the month 7during which the loan is consummated. If the Federal Reserve 8System stops publication of the Federal Funds Rate, the 9Director of the Division of Financial Institutions shall 10designate a substantially equivalent index.11(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.